Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB352.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3 of the act of November 26, 1978 (P.L.1375, No.325), known as the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Flood-related hazard." Any gravel bar, flood debris or similar obstruction which may present a substantial potential 1234567891011121314151617181920 risk to life or property or may create additional problems in the event of flooding.* * *Section 2. Section 4 of the act is amended to read:Section 4. Scope.(a) This act shall apply to:(1) All dams on a natural or artificial watercourse, other than those licensed pursuant to the Federal Power Act, where:(i) the contributory drainage area exceeds 100 acres; or(ii) the greatest depth of water at maximum storage elevation exceeds 15 feet; or(iii) the impounding capacity at maximum storage elevation exceeds 50 acre-feet.(2) All dams used for the storage of water not located on a watercourse and which have no contributory drainage, where the greatest depth of water at maximum storage elevation exceeds 15 feet and the impounding capacity at maximum storage elevation exceeds 50 acre-feet.(3) All dams used for the storage of fluids or semifluids other than water, the escape of which may result in air, water or land pollution, or may result in danger to persons or property.(4) All water obstructions and encroachments other than dams, located in, along, across or projecting into any watercourse, floodway or body of water, whether temporary or permanent.(b) This act shall not apply to a person taking actions to mitigate a flood-related hazard on a normal agricultural 20250SB0352PN0289 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 operation, as defined in section 2 of the act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), referred to as the Right-to-Farm Law.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0352PN0289 - 3 - 123